Georgia statutes. TITLE 42 Penal Institutions
Article 2 Grants of Pardons, Paroles, and Other Relief
42-9-51.
Final hearing for parole or conditional release violator; order and statement as to disposition of violator; revocations without hearing and temporary revocations.

A parolee who has allegedly violated the terms of his parole or conditional release shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection, have a right to a final hearing before the board, to be held within a reasonable time after the occurrence of one of the events listed in this subsection. No final hearing shall be required or permitted if the parolee or conditional releasee has been convicted of or entered any form of guilty plea or plea of nolo contendere in any federal or state court of record to any felony crime, or misdemeanor involving physical injury, committed by the parolee or conditional releasee during a term of parole or conditional release, and which new conviction results in imposition by the convicting court of a term of imprisonment, and, in such cases, the board shall revoke the entire unexpired term of parole or conditional release. In no case shall a final hearing be required if the parolee or conditional releasee has signed a waiver of final hearing. The final hearing, if any, shall be held within a reasonable time:

After an arrest warrant has been issued by a member of the board and probable cause for revocation has been found by the preliminary hearing officer;

After a majority of the board overrules a determination by the preliminary hearing officer that probable cause does not exist;

After the board or two of its members are informed of an alleged violation and decide to consider the matter of revocation without issuing a warrant for the alleged violator’s arrest; or

After a determination has been made that no preliminary hearing is required under subsection (a) of Code Section 42-9-50.

The purpose of the hearing shall be to determine whether the alleged violator has in fact committed any acts which would constitute a violation of the terms and conditions of his parole or conditional release and whether those acts are of such a nature as to warrant revocation of parole or conditional release.

When a parolee or conditional releasee has been convicted of any crime, whether a felony or a misdemeanor, or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere thereto in a court of record, his parole or conditional release may be revoked without a hearing before the board. Moreover, whenever it shall appear to the board that a parolee or conditional releasee either has absconded or has been convicted of another crime in a federal court or in a court of record of another state, the board may issue an order of temporary revocation of parole or conditional release, together with its warrant for such violator, which shall suspend the running of the parolee’s or conditional releasee’s time from the date of the temporary revocation of parole or conditional release to the date of the determination by the board as to whether the temporary revocation shall be made permanent. If the board determines that there has been no violation of the conditions of the parole or conditional release, then the parolee or the releasee shall be reinstated upon his original parole or conditional release without any loss of time and the order of temporary revocation of parole or conditional release and the warrant shall be withdrawn.

In all cases in which there is a hearing before the board, the alleged violator shall be given written notice of the time and place of the hearing and of the claimed violations of parole or conditional release. In addition, this notice shall advise him of the following rights:

His right to disclosure of evidence introduced against him; provided, however, this right shall not be construed to require the board to disclose to an alleged violator confidential information contained in its files which has no direct bearing on the matter of parole revocation;

His opportunity to be heard in person and to present witnesses and documentary evidence;

His right to confront and cross-examine adverse witnesses, unless a majority of the board determines that disclosure of a particular informant’s identity would cause that informant or a member of his family to suffer a risk of harm; and

His right to subpoena witnesses and documents through the board as provided in subsections (e) and (f) of this Code section.

The notice shall be served by delivering it to the alleged violator in person, by delivering it to a person 18 years or older at his last known place of residence, or by depositing it in the mail properly addressed to his last known place of residence.

The board shall have the power to issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses at the hearing provided for by this Code section. The subpoenas shall be issued without discrimination between public and private parties. When a subpoena is disobeyed, any party may apply to the superior court of the county in which the hearing provided for by this Code section is held for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with the order shall be cause for punishment as for contempt of court. The manner of service of subpoenas and costs of securing the attendance of witnesses, including fees and mileage, shall be determined, computed, and assessed in the same manner as prescribed by law for cases in the superior court.

The board shall have the power to issue subpoenas for the production of documents or other written evidence at the hearing provided for by this Code section, but upon written request made promptly and before the hearing the board may quash or modify the subpoena if it is unreasonable or oppressive or may condition denial of the request upon the advancement by the person in whose behalf the subpoena is issued of the reasonable cost of producing the documents or other written evidence. Enforcement of such subpoenas may be sought in the same manner as is provided in subsection (e) of this Code section for subpoenas to compel attendance of witnesses.

Within a reasonable time after the hearing provided for by this Code section, the board shall enter an order (1) rescinding parole or conditional release and returning the parolee or conditional releasee to serve the sentence theretofore imposed upon him, with benefit of computing the time so served on parole or conditional release as a part of his sentence; or (2) reinstating the parole or conditional release or shall enter such other order as it may deem proper. The board shall issue a written statement which shall indicate its reasons for revoking or not reinstating parole or conditional release or for taking such other action as it deems appropriate and shall also indicate the evidence relied upon in determining the facts which form the basis for these reasons. The parolee or conditional releasee who is the subject of the board’s decision shall be furnished with a copy of this written statement.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 17; Ga. L. 1955, p. 351, § 1; Ga. L. 1964, p. 497, § 1; Ga. L. 1965, p. 478, § 2; Ga. L. 1975, p. 786, § 3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 812, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 3221, § 11.

42-9-52.
Discharge from parole; earned-time allowance; granting of pardons, commutations, and remissions of fines, forfeitures, or penalties.

No person who has been placed on parole shall be discharged therefrom by the board prior to the expiration of the term for which he or she was sentenced or until he or she shall have been duly pardoned or otherwise released as provided in this Code section or as otherwise provided by law.

The board may adopt rules and regulations, policies, and procedures for the granting of earned time to persons while serving their sentences on parole or other conditional release to the same extent and in the same amount as if such person were serving the sentence in custody. The board shall also be authorized to withhold or to forfeit, in whole or in part, any such earned-time allowance.

When a parolee or conditional releasee is serving a split sentence for a qualified offense, as such term is defined in Code Section 42-8-21, the board shall review such case after such parolee or conditional releasee has successfully completed 12 consecutive months of parole supervision to consider commutation of such sentence. The board may relieve a parolee or conditional releasee from making further reports and may permit such person to leave the state or county if satisfied that this is for the parolee’s or conditional releasee’s best interest and for the best interest of society. When a parolee or conditional releasee has, in the opinion of the board, so conducted himself or herself as to deserve a pardon or a commutation of sentence or the remission in whole or in part of any fine, forfeiture, or penalty, the board may grant such relief in cases within its power. The board may take into consideration whether or not a person is serving a split sentence in its determination of granting any relief.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 18; Ga. L. 1965, p. 478, § 3; Ga. L. 1980, p. 402, § 1; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-14/SB 174.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the subsection designations; in subsection (a), inserted “or she” twice; and, in subsection (c), added the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “parolee or conditional releasee” for “person on parole or other conditional release” near the beginning and substituted “such person” for “the person” near the middle, in the third sentence, deleted “other” preceding “conditional releasee” near the beginning and inserted “or herself” near the middle, and added the last sentence.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-53.
Preservation of documents; classification of information and documents; divulgence of confidential state secrets; conduct of hearings.

Subject to other laws, the board shall preserve on file all documents on which it has acted in the granting of pardons, paroles, conditional releases, and other relief.

All information, both oral and written, received by the members of the board in the performance of their duties under this chapter and all reports, files, records, and information coming into their possession by reason of the performance of their duties under this chapter shall be classified as confidential state secrets until declassified by the board; provided, however, that the board shall be authorized:

To disclose to an alleged violator of parole or conditional release the evidence introduced against him or her at a final hearing on the matter of revocation of parole or conditional release; and

To disclose information as provided in Code Section 42-9-61.

The department may make supervision records of the department available to officials employed with the Department of Corrections and the Sexual Offender Registration Review Board, provided that the same shall remain confidential and not available to any other person or subject to subpoena unless declassified by the commissioner of community supervision.

No person shall divulge or cause to be divulged in any manner any confidential state secret. Any person violating this Code section or any person who causes or procures a violation of this Code section or conspires to violate this Code section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor.

All hearings required to be held by this chapter shall be public, and the transcript thereof shall be exempt from subsection (b) of this Code section. All records and documents which were public records at the time they were received by the board shall be exempt from subsection (b) of this Code section. All information, reports, and documents required by law to be made available to the General Assembly, the Governor, or the state auditor shall be exempt from subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 20; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 210, § 1; Ga. L. 1975, p. 786, § 4; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 42; Ga. L. 2011, p. 620, § 2/SB 214; Ga. L. 2013, p. 1056, § 2/HB 122; Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 7/HB 71; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-89/HB 310; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-15/SB 174.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, inserted “and the Sexual Offender Registration Review Board” near the end of subsection (b).

The 2015 amendments.

The first 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote subsection (b). The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote subsection (b). See Editor’s notes for applicability. See Code Commission notes regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, inserted “conditional releases,” in subsection (a); in paragraph (b)(1), substituted “reports, files, records, and information” for “records, papers, and documents” near the middle, and substituted a colon for “to” at the end; added the subparagraph (b)(1)(A) designation; in subparagraph (b)(1)(A), added “To” at the beginning and substituted “; and” for a period at the end; added subparagraph (b)(1)(B); inserted “, upon conviction,” near the end of the last sentence of subsection (c); and, in subsection (d), substituted “shall be exempt” for “are exempt” in the second and last sentences.

Cross references.

Management of records of state entities generally, §

50-18-90

et seq.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, the amendment of subsection (b) of this Code section by Ga. L. 2015, p. 207, § 7/HB 71, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-89/HB 310, due to irreconcilable conflict.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of death penalty law, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 197 (2004).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

42-9-54.
Effect of pardons upon civil and political disabilities; conditional pardons prohibited.

All pardons shall relieve those pardoned from civil and political disabilities imposed because of their convictions.

No conditional pardons shall be issued.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, §§ 20, 26.

42-9-55.
Cooperation by jails or correctional institutions with board.

The superintendent, warden, or jailer of any jail or state or county correctional institution in which persons convicted of a crime may be confined and all officers or employees thereof shall at all times cooperate with the board and, upon its request, shall furnish it with such information as they may have respecting any person inquired about as will enable the board properly to perform its duties. Such officials shall, at all reasonable times, when the public safety permits, give the members of the board and its authorized agents and employees access to all inmates in their charge.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 19.

42-9-56.
Restriction on Governor’s powers.

The Governor shall have no authority or power whatever over the granting of pardons or paroles.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 21; Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 7.

Cross references.

Imposition and review of death sentences generally, §

17-10-30

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 500, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides as follows: “It is the intent of this Act to implement certain changes required by Article IV, Section II of the Constitution of the State of Georgia.”

42-9-57.
Effect of chapter on probation power of courts; cooperation by board with the department.

Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as repealing any power given to any court of this state to place offenders on probation or to provide for terms of offender supervison. The board shall be authorized to cooperate with the department, except that it shall not assume or pay any financial obligations thereof.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 22; Ga. L. 1994, p. 97, § 42; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-90/HB 310.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions which read: “Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed as repealing any power given to any court of this state to place offenders on probation or to supervise the same nor any power of any probation agency set up in any county of the state in conjunction with the courts. The board shall be authorized to cooperate with any such agencies, except that it shall not assume or pay any financial obligations thereof. The board shall also be authorized to cooperate with the courts for the probation of offenders in those counties in which there is no existing probation agency, when a court so requests.” See Editor’s notes for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 6-1/HB 310, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective July 1, 2015, and shall apply to sentences entered on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

42-9-58.
Effect of chapter on other laws respecting parole and probation.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to change or modify the laws respecting parole and probation as administered by the juvenile courts of this state or the Department of Human Services or the courts where persons have been placed on probation in cases involving nonsupport or abandonment of minor children.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 25; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

42-9-59.
Effect of chapter on previously granted pardons, paroles, and probations.

This chapter shall not affect pardons, paroles, or probations acted upon prior to February 5, 1943.

History.

Ga. L. 1943, p. 185, § 27.

42-9-60.
Overcrowding of prison system as creating state of emergency; paroling inmates to reduce prison system population to capacity; annual report of inmates paroled.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Capacity” shall mean the actual bed space in the prison system of the State of Georgia now or in the future, as certified by the commissioner of corrections and approved by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget.

“Dangerous offender” means a state prison inmate who is imprisoned for conviction of any one or more of the following crimes as defined by Title 16, the “Criminal Code of Georgia”: murder, voluntary manslaughter, kidnapping, armed robbery, rape, aircraft hijacking, aggravated sodomy, aggravated battery, aggravated assault, incest, child molestation, child abuse, or enticing a child for indecent purposes, or any felony punishable under Code Section 16-13-31, relating to prohibited acts regarding marijuana, cocaine, and illegal drugs. The term “dangerous offender” shall also include an inmate who is incarcerated for a second or subsequent time for the commission of a crime for which the inmate could have been sentenced to life imprisonment.

“Population” shall mean the actual number of inmates present in the correctional institutions of the state prison system and shall not include state inmates assigned to county operated correctional institutions.

The Governor, upon certification by the commissioner of corrections and approval by the director of the Office of Planning and Budget that the population of the prison system of the State of Georgia has exceeded the capacity for 30 consecutive days, may, within five days of receipt of the commissioner’s certification, declare a state of emergency with regard to jail and prison overcrowding.

Upon the declaration of a state of emergency with regard to the jail and prison overcrowding by the Governor, the board shall select sufficient state prison inmates to reduce the state prison population to 100 percent of its capacity and issue such selected inmates a parole, but no dangerous offender shall be eligible for selection by the board. The board shall give special consideration for early release under this Code section to inmates who have participated in educational programs and who have achieved a fifth-grade level or higher on standardized reading tests. The selection of state prison inmates to be released under the authority contained in this Code section may be made without regard to limitations placed upon the service of a portion of the prison sentence provided by Code Section 42-9-45.

It shall be the duty of the director of the Office of Planning and Budget to prepare an annual report on prison inmates who are paroled pursuant to this Code section. Such report shall summarize each such former inmate’s behavior since parole and generally evaluate the former inmate’s success or lack of success in becoming a law-abiding member of society. The annual report shall be filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate on or before December 31, with the first such report submitted by December 31 of the first year that prison inmates are paroled pursuant to this Code section. A notice of the filing of this report shall be submitted to each member of the General Assembly when the annual report is filed with the Clerk of the House of Representatives and the Secretary of the Senate. Copies of this report shall be made available to members of the General Assembly upon their request. The board, the Department of Corrections, and other departments and agencies of the state government shall cooperate with and assist the director of the Office of Planning and Budget in developing the information necessary to prepare the annual reports required by this subsection.

History.

Ga. L. 1982, p. 1356, §§ 2-5; Code 1981, §

42-9-60

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1356, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 31; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42; Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1596, § 5; Ga. L. 1997, p. 143, § 42.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-5

, in 1985, the amendment of this Code section by Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 42, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 1985, p. 283, § 1, due to irreconcilable conflict. See County of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417

(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273

(1974).

Editor’s notes.

Section 1 of Ga. L. 1982, p. 1356 (§ 6 of which enacted this Code section) did not amend the Official Code of Georgia Annotated or any prior law. Sections 1 through 5 of the 1982 Act became effective April 14, 1982, but, unlike §§ 2 through 5, § 1 did not stand repealed on November 1, 1982; see § 7 of the 1982 Act. Section 1 reads as follows: “The General Assembly recognizes that the number of persons convicted of crimes in the State of Georgia and sentenced to serve terms of imprisonment in the state prison system has increased greatly in recent years; that, under the moral requirements of humane treatment for prisoners, there is a limit to the present capacity of penal institutions comprising the prison system of the State of Georgia; that, because of the limited present capacity of the state penal system, there is a resulting crisis in overcrowding of local jail and detention facilities due to the backlog of convicted persons awaiting transfer to the state prison system; that the delay in time required to construct new state prison facilities in order to increase the capacity of the state prison system would cause little present relief of the crisis of overcrowding which exists in jail and local detention facilities; that there is an uncertainty as to future needs for additional capacity in the state prison system if alternatives to incarceration are adequately developed and utilized after the present crisis has passed; that there is an uncertainty as to the necessity for local governments to build additional bed space in jails and local detention facilities at their own expense to alleviate the present overcrowding crisis if the present state capacity may be better utilized to relieve that crisis; and, finally, that the release of state prison inmates not otherwise eligible for release on parole is necessary to alleviate the overcrowded prison system during a declared emergency. It is the purpose of this Act to authorize the Governor and the State Board of Pardons and Paroles to remedy an emergency with regard to the overcrowding of the state prison system.”

42-9-61.
Request for report; disclosure’s impact on confidentiality.

After the board provides the notice of making a final decision on parole or conditional release as required by subsection (c) of Code Section 42-9-43, both the prosecuting attorney and the person being considered for such relief may make a written request to the board for the report set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-9-43 and the board shall promptly provide such report as well as any other information the board has declassified.

The disclosure of the report set forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 42-9-43 pursuant to this Code section shall not vitiate the confidential nature of such report and such report shall not be subject to disclosure under Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

History.

Code 1981, §

42-9-61

, enacted by Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 2-16/SB 174.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2017.